Hawaii statutes.
§201-2.5 Fees for services rendered and
products provided. (a) The department of business, economic development,
and tourism may establish reasonable fees for services rendered and products
provided by the department. The department shall maintain a reasonable
relationship between the revenues derived from fees and the cost or fair value
of services rendered and products provided.

(b) The department shall adopt rules pursuant
to chapter 91 to carry out its responsibilities under this section. [L 1987, c
122, §2 and am c 336, §7; am L 1990, c 293, §8]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next